Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1106
Chemigation, defined.

Chemigation shall mean any process whereby chemicals are applied to land or crops in or with water through an onfarm irrigation distribution system.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 6.